Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 24

Tennessee TennCare Pharmacy Advisory Committee

71-5-2401. Establishment — Members — Recommendations concerning drugs on auto-exemptions list.

There is established in the department of finance and administration a state TennCare pharmacy advisory committee. The committee shall make recommendations regarding a preferred drug list (PDL) to govern all state expenditures for prescription drugs for the TennCare program.

The state TennCare pharmacy advisory committee shall be composed of fifteen (15) members. Except for initial appointments, members shall be appointed to three-year terms.

Appointments by the governor shall be made as follows:

One (1) practicing psychiatrist who participates in the TennCare program, who may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested psychiatric groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Psychiatric Association. The initial appointee shall serve a three-year term;

One (1) practicing nurse practitioner or physician assistant who participates in the TennCare program, who may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested nursing or physician assistant groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Nurses Association or the Tennessee Academy of Physician Assistants. The initial appointee shall serve a one-year term;

One (1) practicing physician who participates in the TennCare program, who may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested geriatric groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Geriatric Society and the Tennessee Chapter of the American Association of Retired Persons, and who is a gerontologist or whose practice otherwise is primarily among the aged. The initial appointee shall serve a two-year term;

One (1) practicing pediatrician who participates in the TennCare program, who may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested pediatric groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics. The initial appointee shall serve a one-year term;

One (1) family practitioner who participates in the TennCare program, who may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested family physician groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Academy of Family Physicians. The initial appointee shall serve a two-year term;

One (1) practicing cardiologist who participates in the TennCare program, who may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested cardiology groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Chapter of the American College of Cardiology. The initial appointee shall serve a three-year term;

One (1) practicing pharmacist who participates in the TennCare program, who may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested chain drug groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Chain Drug Council. The initial appointee shall serve a one-year term;

One (1) pharmacy director from a managed care organization participating in the TennCare program. The initial appointee shall serve a two-year term; and

One (1) member of an organization engaged in advocacy on behalf of members of the TennCare program. The initial appointee shall serve a three-year term.

Appointments by the speaker of the senate shall be made as follows:

One (1) general internist who participates in the TennCare program, who may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested medical groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Medical Association. The initial appointee shall serve a three-year term; and

One (1) practicing pharmacist who is engaged in the retail distribution of prescription drugs and who participates in the TennCare program, who may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested pharmacist groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Pharmacists Association. The initial appointee shall serve a two-year term.

Appointments by the speaker of the house of representatives shall be made as follows:

One (1) general internist who participates in the TennCare program from a list of all general internists provided by interested medical groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Chapter of the American College of Physicians. The initial appointee shall serve a one-year term; and

One (1) practicing pharmacist who is engaged in the distribution of prescription drugs in the nursing home industry and who participates in the TennCare program, who may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested pharmacist groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Pharmacists Association. The initial appointee shall serve a three-year term.

The pharmacy director and medical director of TennCare; the chair of the health committee of the house of representatives, or the chair's designee; and the chair of the health and welfare committee of the senate, or the chair's designee shall serve as ex officio members of the state TennCare pharmacy advisory committee.

The appointing authorities shall consult with the interested groups listed in subsection (b) to determine qualified persons to fill the positions.

In making appointments to the committee, the appointing authorities shall strive to ensure the committee's membership is representative of the state's geographic and demographic composition with appropriate attention to the representation of women and minorities.

The governor shall appoint a chair and vice chair of the committee, whose terms shall expire on December 31 of the year in which they are appointed or upon the appointment of their successors by the governor, whichever is later.

The chair of the committee shall call meetings of the committee and shall preside at all regular and special meetings of the committee, appoint members to any subcommittees established by the committee, prepare agendas with the assistance of the pharmacy director and the medical director of TennCare, and notify members of their removal from the committee.

The vice chair shall exercise all powers of the chair in the event of the absence or inability of the chair to serve and shall perform other duties as the chair may assign to the vice chair.

Committee meetings shall follow Robert's Revised Rules of Order.

Committee meetings shall be subject to title 8, chapter 44; provided, however, that notice of meetings and the agenda for the meetings shall be made available to the public not less than ten (10) days prior to any meeting of the committee.

Committee decisions shall be made based on affirmative votes of the majority of members present at official meetings.

The committee shall keep minutes of all meetings including votes on all recommendations regarding drugs to be included on the state preferred drug list.

A quorum shall be established by the presence of eight (8) committee members present at an official meeting.

The chair may request that other physicians, pharmacists, faculty members of institutions of higher learning, or medical experts who participate in various subspecialties act as consultants to the committee as needed.

Vacancies shall be filled by the appropriate appointing authority in the same manner as full terms for the remainder of the unexpired term.

The TennCare pharmacy advisory committee shall have recommendation authority over any new proposed deletions or additions to drugs currently on the TennCare bureau's auto-exemption list. It is the legislative intent that, insofar as practical, the TennCare bureau shall have the benefit of the committee's recommendations prior to deleting or adding a drug from the auto-exemption list.

The pharmacy advisory committee shall establish a special review subcommittee comprised of practicing medical specialists and medical faculty members of institutions of higher learning with expertise in the usage and prescribing of the medications under review to provide expert advice on the new proposed changes. The subcommittee shall be appointed by the chairman in consultation with members of the pharmacy advisory committee.

Meetings of the special review subcommittee established pursuant to this subsection (n) shall meet the requirements of the state's open meetings law, compiled in title 8, chapter 44, and documents relating to any recommendations made by the subcommittee to limit access to a medication or biological under review shall be available under the open records law. Members of the public attending the meeting shall be granted the opportunity to comment on information presented prior to the subcommittee making its final recommendation.

Acts 2003, ch. 350, § 1; 2005, ch. 153, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 509, § 1; 2012, ch. 699, §§ 3, 4; 2012, ch. 825, § 1; 2016, ch. 1079, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. The state TennCare pharmacy advisory committee, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§4-29-112,4-29-242.

Acts 2003, ch. 350, § 6 provided that if a court of competent jurisdiction enjoins, restrains or stays programs authorized by this part, then the department of finance and administration or the bureau of TennCare as appropriate is authorized to proceed to implement as appropriate those portions of this part that have not been lawfully enjoined, restrained or stayed.

Acts 2016, ch. 1079, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “TennCare Omnibus Act of 2016”.

71-5-2402. Removal of member.

A state TennCare pharmacy advisory committee member shall be removed by the commissioner of finance and administration from the committee for any of the following causes:

Absence from two (2) consecutive meetings without contacting the chair or the vice chair with a satisfactory explanation;

Absence from three (3) meetings in a single year without contacting the chair or the vice chair with a satisfactory explanation;

Violation of § 71-5-2403(a) and (b); or

Violation of § 71-5-197(d).

Acts 2003, ch. 350, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 350, § 6 provided that if a court of competent jurisdiction enjoins, restrains or stays programs authorized by this part, then the department of finance and administration or the bureau of TennCare as appropriate is authorized to proceed to implement as appropriate those portions of this part that have not been lawfully enjoined, restrained or stayed.

71-5-2403. Conflicts of interest — Compensation.

Members of the state TennCare pharmacy advisory committee shall not enter any financial relationships with pharmaceutical manufacturers or their affiliates during their tenure on the state TennCare pharmacy advisory committee. A member shall not entertain individual lobbying or marketing, or participate in any other activity or discussions with pharmaceutical manufacturers or their representatives for the purpose of influencing the preferred drug list (PDL) that would call into question the member's impartiality in determining drugs to recommend for inclusion on a state PDL. Nothing in this subsection (a) shall prohibit a member from engaging in common business practices or prohibit communications to or from the member that occur in the ordinary course of the member's business or professional activities.

A conflict of interest exists when the member has a significant personal, professional, or monetary interest in a matter under consideration by the state TennCare pharmacy advisory committee. Persons being considered for membership on the state TennCare pharmacy advisory committee shall disclose if they have a real or apparent conflict of interest. Conflicts of interest may include, but shall not be limited to, being the recipient of a grant, hired as a consultant, being part of a speakers bureau, a major stock holder, or the recipient of other financial support from an organization likely to benefit financially from the outcome of the state TennCare pharmacy advisory committee's work.

Members shall dispose of matters before the committee in an unbiased and professional manner. In the event that a matter being considered by the committee presents a real or apparent conflict of interest, such members shall disclose the conflict to the chair and recuse themselves from any official action on the matter.

Members shall receive no compensation for their service on the state TennCare pharmacy advisory committee but may be reimbursed for those expenses allowed by the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 2003, ch. 350, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 350, § 6 provided that if a court of competent jurisdiction enjoins, restrains or stays programs authorized by this part, then the department of finance and administration or the bureau of TennCare as appropriate is authorized to proceed to implement as appropriate those portions of this part that have not been lawfully enjoined, restrained or stayed.

71-5-2404. Recommendations for inclusion on preferred drug list.

The TennCare pharmacy advisory committee shall submit to the bureau of TennCare both specific and general recommendations for drugs to be included on any state preferred drug list (PDL) adopted by the bureau. In making its recommendations, the committee shall consider factors including, but not limited to, efficacy, the use of generic drugs and therapeutic equivalent drugs, and cost information related to each drug. The committee shall also submit recommendations to the bureau regarding computerized, voice, and written prior authorization, including prior authorization criteria, and step therapy.

The state TennCare pharmacy advisory committee shall include evidence-based research in making its recommendations for drugs to be included on the PDL.

Any individual shall be permitted to make a public presentation to the TennCare pharmacy advisory committee regarding a drug or classes of drugs under consideration for the TennCare preferred drug list, in accordance with the following:

A presentation shall be limited to an agenda item and there shall be a maximum of three (3) presentations per agenda item;

A request to make a verbal presentation shall be submitted in writing by fax or electronically to the pharmacy director of the bureau of TennCare, or the named designee, with a copy to the chairman of the TennCare pharmacy advisory committee no later than seventy-two (72) hours in advance of the scheduled meeting;

The time limit for a verbal presentation by or on behalf of a pharmaceutical manufacturer shall not exceed five (5) minutes in aggregate per drug per manufacturer or organization, or five (5) minutes by an individual, manufacturer or organization speaking on a particular position. The committee may, by a unanimous vote, extend the time limitation for presentation; and

An individual, manufacturer or organization may present updated or new information, including drug package insert changes, new indications or peer-reviewed journal articles on a product.

The committee may receive written studies, data and information relative to the cost-effectiveness of drugs being considered for placement on the preferred drug list. Such written information shall be distributed to the TennCare pharmacy advisory committee members. Such written information must be received by the TennCare pharmacy director no later than five (5) business days prior to the scheduled pharmacy advisory committee meeting.

TennCare or its designee shall provide the state TennCare pharmacy advisory committee, the office of inspector general, and the state's medicaid fraud control unit with clinical and economic research and utilization information as requested on drugs and drug classes.

The TennCare bureau shall consider the recommendations of the state TennCare pharmacy advisory committee in amending or revising any PDL adopted by the bureau to apply to pharmacy expenditures within the TennCare program. The recommendations of the committee are advisory only, and the bureau may adopt or amend a PDL regardless of whether it has received any recommendations from the committee. It is the legislative intent that, insofar as practical, the TennCare bureau shall have the benefit of the committee's recommendations prior to implementing a PDL or portions thereof.

Acts 2003, ch. 350, § 1; 2004, ch. 673, §§ 16, 17; 2005, ch. 259, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 350, § 6 provided that if a court of competent jurisdiction enjoins, restrains or stays programs authorized by this part, then the department of finance and administration or the bureau of TennCare as appropriate is authorized to proceed to implement as appropriate those portions of this part that have not been lawfully enjoined, restrained or stayed.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 29 provided that to effectuate the provisions of the act, the commissioner of finance and administration shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations not otherwise provided for in this act. All rules and regulations provided for in this act are authorized to be promulgated as public necessity rules (now emergency rules) pursuant to §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.